Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1541
Director; charges against insurer; notice; hearing.

If the director finds that any insurer doing business in this state is engaging in any unfair claims settlement practice and that a proceeding in respect thereto would be in the public interest, he or she shall issue and serve upon such insurer a statement of the charges in that respect and a notice of hearing thereon, which notice shall set a hearing date not less than ten days from the date of the notice.

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 23.